Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.280

Admonitions to jurors.

The court may admonish the jurors that they must not discuss among themselves any subject connected with the trial until they begin their deliberations. The court may also admonish the jurors that they must not discuss with nonjurors any subject connected with the trial until the jurors have been dismissed from the case.

[ 2003 c 406 s 15; 1957 c 7 s 5; Code 1881 s 226; 1877 p 47 s 230; 1869 p 56 s 230; RRS s 345.]

NOTES:

Care of jury while deliberating: RCW 4.44.300.